Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-113.2 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any ballot measure authorizing the issuance of debt to be


paid by the levy of an ad valorem tax shall only be voted on in a


General Election.


B. Any measure that authorizes the levy of an ad valorem tax or


increases the rate of ad valorem taxation shall be printed in such a


manner as to include, above the proposition, language containing the


following language: “THIS IS A TAX INCREASE.” The language shall


also include the following information:


1. The current and proposed millage rates;

Req. No. 2877 Page 1


2. The total estimated tax increase for the average household;


and


3. The purpose for expending the proposed revenues.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2877 QD 1/14/2026 10:44:31 PM





































Req. No. 2877 Page 2